Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,119
Personalized message license plates; application; renewal; fee.

(1) Application for personalized message license plates shall be made to the department. The department shall make available through each county treasurer forms to be used for such applications.

(2) Each initial application shall be accompanied by a fee of forty dollars. The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit forty percent of the fee to the Highway Trust Fund and sixty percent of the fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(3) An application for renewal of a license plate previously approved and issued shall be accompanied by a fee of forty dollars. County treasurers collecting fees pursuant to this subsection shall remit them to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit forty percent of the fee to the Highway Trust Fund and sixty percent of the fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 119;

Laws 2009, LB110, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 72;

Laws 2019, LB356, § 9;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 19.